sv: Användningsområde för trycksensor: A/C-köldmedietryck; Luftfjädringstryck; Laddtryck/insugsrörstryck; Bromsvätska / hydraultryck; Kylsystemstryck; Differential- / axelvätsketryck; Kylvätske- / värmesystemstryck för elbilsbatteri; Avgasmottryck; Bränsletryck; Oljetryck; Servostyrningstryck; Däcktryck (TPMS); Transmissionsvätsketryck; Vakuumtryck; Övrigt
pt-BR: Sensor de pressão aplicação: Pressão do fluido refrigerante do ar-condicionado; Pressão da suspensão a ar; Pressão do turbo/coletor de admissão; Pressão do fluido de freio/hidráulica; Pressão do sistema de arrefecimento; Pressão do fluido do diferencial/eixo; Pressão do líquido de arrefecimento da bateria de VE/sistema térmico; Contrapressão do escapamento; Pressão de combustível; Pressão de óleo; Pressão da direção hidráulica; Pressão dos pneus (TPMS); Pressão do fluido de transmissão; Pressão de vácuo; Outra
pl: Zastosowanie czujnika ciśnienia: Ciśnienie czynnika chłodniczego klimatyzacji; Ciśnienie zawieszenia pneumatycznego; Ciśnienie doładowania / w kolektorze ssącym; Ciśnienie płynu hamulcowego / hydrauliczne; Ciśnienie w układzie chłodzenia; Ciśnienie oleju w mechanizmie różnicowym / osi; Ciśnienie w układzie chłodzenia / termicznym akumulatora EV; Ciśnienie zwrotne spalin; Ciśnienie paliwa; Ciśnienie oleju; Ciśnienie w układzie wspomagania kierownicy; Ciśnienie w oponach (TPMS); Ciśnienie płynu transmisyjnego; Podciśnienie; Inne
fr: Usage du capteur de pression: Pression du réfrigérant de climatisation; Pression de suspension pneumatique; Pression de suralimentation / d’admission (collecteur); Pression de liquide de frein / hydraulique; Pression du système de refroidissement; Pression de fluide de différentiel / d’essieu; Pression du liquide de refroidissement de batterie de VE / du système thermique; Contre-pression d’échappement; Pression de carburant; Pression d’huile; Pression de direction assistée; Pression des pneus (TPMS); Pression de fluide de transmission; Dépression; Autre
hu: Nyomásérzékelő alkalmazása: Légkondicionáló hűtőközeg-nyomása; Légrugózás nyomása; Töltő- / szívócsőnyomás; Fékfolyadék / hidraulikus nyomás; Hűtőrendszer nyomása; Differenciálmű / tengelyfolyadék nyomása; Elektromos jármű (EV) akkumulátorhűtő / hőkezelő rendszer nyomása; Kipufogó ellennyomása; Üzemanyagnyomás; Olajnyomás; Szervokormány-nyomás; Guminyomás (TPMS); Sebességváltó-folyadék nyomása; Vákuumnyomás; Egyéb
da: Tryksensoranvendelse: A/C-kølemiddeltryk; Luftaffjedringstryk; Ladetryk/indsugningstryk (manifold); Bremsevæske-/hydrauliktryk; Kølesystemtryk; Differentiale-/akselvæsketryk; Elbils batterikølemiddel/termisk systemtryk; Udstødningsmodtryk; Brændstoftryk; Olietryk; Servostyringstryk; Dæktryk (TPMS); Gearkassevæsketryk; Vakuumtryk; Andet
de: Verwendungszweck des Drucksensors: Klimaanlagen-Kältemitteldruck; Luftfederungsdruck; Ladedruck / Saugrohrdruck; Bremsflüssigkeits- / Hydraulikdruck; Kühlsystemdruck; Differential- / Achsflüssigkeitsdruck; Druck im EV-Batteriekühl- / Thermalsystem; Abgasgegendruck; Kraftstoffdruck; Öldruck; Servolenkungsdruck; Reifendruck (RDKS); Getriebeöldruck; Unterdruck; Sonstige
lt-LT: Slėgio jutiklio paskirtis: A/C šaltnešio slėgis; Pneumatinės pakabos slėgis; Turbinos / įsiurbimo (kolektoriaus) slėgis; Stabdžių skysčio / hidraulinis slėgis; Aušinimo sistemos slėgis; Diferencialo / ašies skysčio slėgis; EV akumuliatoriaus aušinimo / šiluminės sistemos slėgis; Išmetamųjų dujų priešslėgis; Degalų slėgis; Alyvos slėgis; Vairo stiprintuvo slėgis; Padangų slėgis (TPMS); Pavarų dėžės skysčio slėgis; Vakuuminis slėgis; Kita
el: Εφαρμογή αισθητήρα πίεσης: Πίεση ψυκτικού υγρού A/C; Πίεση αερανάρτησης; Πίεση υπερπλήρωσης / πολλαπλής εισαγωγής; Πίεση υγρών φρένων / υδραυλικού συστήματος; Πίεση συστήματος ψύξης; Πίεση υγρών διαφορικού / άξονα; Πίεση ψυκτικού μπαταρίας EV / θερμικού συστήματος; Αντίθλιψη καυσαερίων; Πίεση καυσίμου; Πίεση λαδιού; Πίεση υδραυλικού τιμονιού; Πίεση ελαστικών (TPMS); Πίεση υγρών κιβωτίου ταχυτήτων; Πίεση κενού; Άλλο
sk-SK: Aplikácia tlakového senzora: Tlak chladiva klimatizácie; Tlak vzduchového odpruženia; Tlak plnenia / nasávania (sacieho potrubia); Tlak brzdovej kvapaliny / hydraulický tlak; Tlak chladiaceho systému; Tlak kvapaliny v diferenciáli / náprave; Tlak chladiaceho / tepelného systému batérie EV; Spätný tlak výfuku; Tlak paliva; Tlak oleja; Tlak posilňovača riadenia; Tlak v pneumatikách (TPMS); Tlak prevodovej kvapaliny; Podtlak (vákuum); Iný
hr-HR: Primjena senzora tlaka: Tlak rashladnog sredstva A/C; Tlak zračnog ovjesa; Tlak prednabijanja / usisnog razvodnika; Tlak tekućine za kočnice / hidraulike; Tlak rashladnog sustava; Tlak tekućine diferencijala / osovine; Tlak rashladnog/toplinskog sustava baterije električnog vozila; Protutlak ispuha; Tlak goriva; Tlak ulja; Tlak servo upravljača; Tlak u gumama (TPMS); Tlak tekućine mjenjača; Tlak vakuuma; Ostalo
es: Aplicación del sensor de presión: Presión de refrigerante de aire acondicionado; Presión de suspensión neumática; Presión de sobrealimentación/múltiple de admisión; Líquido de frenos/presión hidráulica; Presión del sistema de refrigeración; Presión de fluido de diferencial/eje; Refrigerante de batería de VE/presión del sistema térmico; Contrapresión de escape; Presión de combustible; Presión de aceite; Presión de dirección asistida; Presión de neumáticos (TPMS); Presión de fluido de transmisión; Presión de vacío; Otro
zh-CN: 压力传感器应用: 空调制冷剂压力; 空气悬挂压力; 增压/进气（歧管）压力; 制动液/液压; 冷却系统压力; 差速器/车轴油压力; 电动汽车电池冷却液/热管理系统压力; 排气背压; 燃油压力; 机油压力; 动力转向压力; 胎压 (TPMS); 变速箱油压力; 真空压力; 其他
nl: Druksensor toepassing: A/C-koelmiddeldruk; Luchtveringsdruk; Turbo- / inlaat(spruitstuk)druk; Remvloeistof- / hydraulische druk; Koelsysteemdruk; Differentieel- / asvloeistofdruk; EV-accukoelvloeistof- / thermische systeemdruk; Uitlaattegendruk; Brandstofdruk; Oliedruk; Stuurbekrachtigingsdruk; Bandenspanning (TPMS); Transmissievloeistofdruk; Vacuümdruk; Anders
cs: Aplikace tlakového senzoru: Tlak chladiva klimatizace; Tlak vzduchového odpružení; Tlak přeplňování / sacího potrubí; Tlak brzdové / hydraulické kapaliny; Tlak chladicího systému; Tlak kapaliny diferenciálu / nápravy; Tlak chladicí kapaliny baterie EV / tepelného systému; Protitlak výfuku; Tlak paliva; Tlak oleje; Tlak posilovače řízení; Tlak v pneumatikách (TPMS); Tlak kapaliny převodovky; Podtlak; Ostatní
ru: Применение датчика давления: Давление хладагента кондиционера; Давление в пневмоподвеске; Давление наддува / во впускном коллекторе; Давление тормозной жидкости / гидравлики; Давление в системе охлаждения; Давление жидкости в дифференциале / мосту; Давление охлаждающей жидкости аккумулятора электромобиля / термосистеме; Противодавление выхлопных газов; Давление топлива; Давление масла; Давление гидроусилителя руля; Давление в шинах (TPMS); Давление трансмиссионной жидкости; Вакуумметрическое давление; Другое
vi: Ứng dụng cảm biến áp suất: Áp suất ga lạnh A/C; Áp suất hệ thống treo khí nén; Áp suất tăng áp / cổ hút; Áp suất dầu phanh / thủy lực; Áp suất hệ thống làm mát; Áp suất dầu vi sai / cầu xe; Áp suất hệ thống làm mát / nhiệt pin xe điện; Áp suất đối áp khí xả; Áp suất nhiên liệu; Áp suất dầu; Áp suất hệ thống lái trợ lực; Áp suất lốp (TPMS); Áp suất dầu hộp số; Áp suất chân không; Khác
ja: 圧力センサーアプリ: A/C冷媒圧力; エアサスペンション圧力; ブースト / 吸気 (マニホールド) 圧力; ブレーキフルード / 油圧; 冷却システム圧力; デフ / アクスルフルード圧力; EVバッテリー冷却 / 熱システム圧力; 排気背圧; 燃圧; 油圧; パワーステアリング圧力; タイヤ空気圧 (TPMS); トランスミッションフルード圧力; 真空圧; その他
sl-SI: Uporaba senzorja tlaka: Tlak hladilnega sredstva klimatske naprave; Tlak zračnega vzmetenja; Tlak polnjenja/sesalnega kolektorja; Tlak zavorne tekočine/hidravlični tlak; Tlak hladilnega sistema; Tlak tekočine v diferencialu/osi; Tlak hladilnega/toplotnega sistema EV-baterije; Povratni tlak izpušnih plinov; Tlak goriva; Tlak olja; Tlak servokrmiljenja; Tlak v pnevmatikah (TPMS); Tlak tekočine v menjalniku; Podtlak; Drugo
ko: 압력 센서 적용 대상: A/C 냉매 압력; 에어 서스펜션 압력; 부스트/흡기(매니폴드) 압력; 브레이크액/유압; 냉각수 시스템 압력; 디퍼렌셜/액슬 유체 압력; EV 배터리 냉각수/열 시스템 압력; 배기 배압; 연료 압력; 오일 압력; 파워 스티어링 압력; 타이어 공기압(TPMS); 변속기 오일 압력; 진공 압력; 기타
fi: Paineanturin käyttötarkoitus: Ilmastoinnin kylmäaineen paine; Ilmajousituksen paine; Ahtopaine / imusarjan paine; Jarrunesteen/hydrauliikan paine; Jäähdytysjärjestelmän paine; Tasauspyörästön / akselin nesteen paine; Sähköauton akun jäähdytysnesteen / lämpöjärjestelmän paine; Pakoputkiston vastapaine; Polttoaineen paine; Öljynpaine; Ohjaustehostimen paine; Rengaspaine (TPMS); Vaihteistonesteen paine; Alipaine; Muu
tr: Basınç sensörü uygulaması: Klima soğutucu gaz basıncı; Havalı süspansiyon basıncı; Takviye / emme (manifold) basıncı; Fren hidroliği / hidrolik basıncı; Soğutma sistemi basıncı; Diferansiyel / aks yağı basıncı; Elektrikli araç batarya soğutucusu / termal sistem basıncı; Egzoz geri basıncı; Yakıt basıncı; Yağ basıncı; Hidrolik direksiyon basıncı; Lastik basıncı (TPMS); Şanzıman yağı basıncı; Vakum basıncı; Diğer
it: Applicazione del sensore di pressione: Pressione del refrigerante A/C; Pressione delle sospensioni pneumatiche; Pressione di sovralimentazione / del collettore di aspirazione; Pressione del liquido dei freni / pressione idraulica; Pressione del sistema di raffreddamento; Pressione del fluido del differenziale / dell'asse; Pressione del refrigerante della batteria EV / del sistema termico; Contropressione di scarico; Pressione del carburante; Pressione dell'olio; Pressione del servosterzo; Pressione degli pneumatici (TPMS); Pressione del fluido della trasmissione; Pressione di vuoto; Altro
nb: Bruk av trykksensor: A/C-kjølemiddeltrykk; Luftfjæringstrykk; Lade- / inntakstrykk (manifold); Bremsevæske- / hydraulikktrykk; Kjølesystemtrykk; Differensial- / akselfluidtrykk; Trykk i kjøle- / termisk system for elbilbatteri; Eksosmottrykk; Drivstofftrykk; Oljetrykk; Servostyringstrykk; Dekktrykk (TPMS); Giroljetrykk; Vakuumtrykk; Annet
en: Pressure sensor application: A/C refrigerant pressure; Air suspension pressure; Boost / intake (manifold) pressure; Brake fluid / hydraulic pressure; Coolant system pressure; Differential / axle fluid pressure; EV battery coolant / thermal system pressure; Exhaust backpressure; Fuel pressure; Oil pressure; Power steering pressure; Tire pressure (TPMS); Transmission fluid pressure; Vacuum pressure; Other
pt-PT: Aplicação do sensor de pressão: Pressão do líquido de refrigeração do ar condicionado; Pressão da suspensão pneumática; Pressão de sobrealimentação/admissão (coletor); Fluido dos travões/pressão hidráulica; Pressão do sistema de refrigeração; Pressão do fluido do diferencial/eixo; Pressão do sistema térmico/refrigerante da bateria do VE; Contrapressão do escape; Pressão do combustível; Pressão do óleo; Pressão da direção assistida; Pressão dos pneus (TPMS); Pressão do fluido de transmissão; Pressão de vácuo; Outra
bg-BG: Приложение на сензора за налягане: Налягане на хладилния агент на климатика; Налягане на въздушното окачване; Налягане на турбото / всмукателния колектор; Налягане на спирачната течност / хидравлично налягане; Налягане на охладителната система; Налягане на течността в диференциала / оста; Налягане на охладителната / термалната система на EV батерията; Противоналягане на отработените газове; Налягане на горивото; Налягане на маслото; Налягане на сервоуправлението; Налягане в гумите (TPMS); Налягане на трансмисионната течност; Вакуумно налягане; Друго
zh-TW: 壓力感測器應用: 冷氣冷媒壓力; 氣壓懸吊壓力; 增壓/進氣 (歧管) 壓力; 煞車油/液壓; 冷卻系統壓力; 差速器/車軸油壓; 電動車電池冷卻/散熱系統壓力; 排氣背壓; 燃油壓力; 機油壓力; 動力方向盤壓力; 胎壓 (TPMS); 變速箱油壓; 真空壓力; 其他
th: เซ็นเซอร์วัดแรงดัน แอปพลิเคชัน: แรงดันน้ำยาแอร์; แรงดันระบบช่วงล่างถุงลม; แรงดันบูสต์ / ท่อร่วมไอดี; แรงดันน้ำมันเบรก / ไฮดรอลิก; แรงดันระบบหล่อเย็น; แรงดันน้ำมันเฟืองท้าย / เพลา; แรงดันน้ำยาหล่อเย็นแบตเตอรี่ EV / ระบบจัดการความร้อน; แรงดันย้อนกลับท่อไอเสีย; แรงดันน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง; แรงดันน้ำมันเครื่อง; แรงดันพวงมาลัยพาวเวอร์; แรงดันลมยาง (TPMS); แรงดันน้ำมันเกียร์; แรงดันสุญญากาศ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Aplicație senzor de presiune: Presiune agent frigorific A/C; Presiune suspensie pneumatică; Presiune de supraalimentare / admisie (galerie); Presiune lichid de frână / hidraulică; Presiune sistem de răcire; Presiune lichid diferențial / punte; Presiune sistem de răcire / termic baterie EV; Contrapresiune evacuare; Presiune combustibil; Presiune ulei; Presiune servodirecție; Presiune anvelope (TPMS); Presiune lichid de transmisie; Presiune vid; Altele